Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0194

Discrimination by governments prohibited.

The state and its political subdivisions, and all officials, agents, employees, or representatives thereof, are prohibited from in any way discriminating against licensed chiropractors in performing and receiving compensation for services covered by their licenses.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 3. Formerly RCW 18.25.140.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.